Utah statutes.
58-42a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  All applicants for licensure as an occupational therapist shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character as it relates to the functions and
responsibilities of the practice of occupational therapy;
(d)  graduate with a bachelors or graduate degree in occupational therapy from
a program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy
Education; and
(e)  be certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational
Therapy as an occupational therapist registered.
(2)  All applicants for licensure as an occupational therapist assistant
shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character as it relates to the functions and
responsibilities of the practice of occupational therapy;
(d)  graduate with a two-year associate degree in occupational therapy from a
program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy
Education; and
(e)  be certified by the National Board for Certification in Occupational
Therapy as a certified occupational therapist assistant.
